Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2249XC (2) 91 ll/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 105.17, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. On and after July 1, 2008, a governmental subdivision 3 shall not prohibit a contractor or a plumbing, mechanical, 4 HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic professional 5 licensed pursuant to this chapter from performing services 6 for which that person is licensed pursuant to this chapter 7 or enforce any contractor or plumbing , and mechanical , 8 HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic professional 9 licensing provisions promulgated by the governmental 10 subdivision against a person licensed pursuant to this chapter . 11 Sec. 2. Section 105.17, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 2. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a governmental 14 subdivision from assessing and collecting permit fees that do 15 not exceed five hundred dollars or inspection fees related to 16 work performed by plumbing, mechanical, HVAC-refrigeration, 17 sheet metal, or hydronic professionals. 18 Sec. 3. Section 331.301, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. A county shall not impose any fee or charge on any 21 individual or business licensed by the plumbing and mechanical 22 systems board for the right to perform plumbing, mechanical, 23 HVAC, refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic systems work 24 within the scope of the license. A county shall not impose a 25 license fee or charge on any individual or business defined as 26 a âgeneral contractorâ as defined in section 572.1, subsection 27 3, or âsubcontractorâ as defined in section 572.1, subsection 28 11. This paragraph does not prohibit a county from charging 29 fees for the issuance of permits that do not exceed five 30 hundred dollars for, and inspections of, work performed in its 31 jurisdiction. 32 Sec. 4. Section 364.3, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, 33 is amended to read as follows: 34 b. A city shall not impose any fee or charge on any 35 -1- LSB 2249XC (2) 91 ll/js 1/ 2 S.F. _____ individual or business licensed by the plumbing and mechanical 1 systems board for the right to perform plumbing, mechanical, 2 HVAC, refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic systems work 3 within the scope of the license. A city shall not impose a 4 license fee or charge on any individual or business defined as 5 a âgeneral contractorâ as defined in section 572.1, subsection 6 3, or âsubcontractorâ as defined in section 572.1, subsection 7 11. This paragraph does not prohibit a city from charging 8 fees for the issuance of permits that do not exceed five 9 hundred dollars for, and inspections of, work performed in its 10 jurisdiction. 11